Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-530
Mechanical Safety Inspection Fund; created; use; investment.

The Mechanical Safety Inspection Fund is created. All fees collected by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to the Nebraska Amusement Ride Act and the Conveyance Safety Act shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Mechanical Safety Inspection Fund. Fees so collected shall be used for administering the provisions of the Nebraska Amusement Ride Act and the Conveyance Safety Act. Any money in the Mechanical Safety Inspection Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Money in the Mechanical Safety Inspection Fund may be transferred to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.

Laws 2007, LB265, § 24;

Laws 2017, LB331, § 46;

R.S.Supp.,2018, § 81-405;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 81.

Conveyance Safety Act, see section 81-5,210.

Nebraska Amusement Ride Act, see section 81-5,190.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.